Missouri, session 2026, HB2547.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 542.525, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 542.525, to read as follows:
542.525. No employee of a state agency or a political subdivision of the state shall
place any surveillance camera or game camera on private property without first obtaining
written consent from the landowner or the landowner's designee[;] or a search warrant as
required by and under Article I, Section 15 of the Constitution of Missouri or the Fourth and
Fourteenth Amendments of the Constitution of the United States[; or permission from the
highest ranking law enforcement chief or officer of the agency or political subdivision,
provided that permission of the highest ranking law enforcement chief or officer of the
agency or political subdivision is valid only when the camera is facing a location that is open
to public access or use and the camera is located within one hundred feet of the intended
surveillance location].
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.